Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-367
Special assessments; collection.

Special sidewalk assessments may be collected in the manner usual for the collection or foreclosure of county or state taxes against real estate.

Laws 1961, c. 92, § 3, p. 319.